Georgia statutes. TITLE 5 Appeal And Error
CHAPTER 3 Appeals to Superior or State Court

Cross references.

Exercise of judicial power, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. IV, Para. I.

Procedure for appeals from decisions of superior court reviewing decisions of lower courts on appeal, §

5-6-35

.

Appeals to superior court from final action of Department of Banking and Finance, §

7-1-90

.

Description of extent of authority of superior court to exercise appellate jurisdiction and to exercise general supervision over all inferior tribunals, §

15-6-8

.

Appeal to superior court from decision of tribunal established to hear matters relating to construction or administration of school law, §

20-2-1160

.

Appeals to superior court from decisions of registration officers denying right of voter registration, §

21-2-224

.

Appeal to jury in superior court from decision of assessors in condemnation proceedings, §

22-2-80

et seq.

Appeal to superior court from award of special master in condemnation proceeding, §

22-2-112

.

Right of appeal to superior court from convictions for traffic offenses, §

40-13-28

.

Appeal to superior court from decision of State Board of Equalization, §

48-2-18

.

Appeal to superior court from orders, rulings, or findings of state revenue commissioner, §

48-2-59

.

Appeal to superior court from final decision by administrative agency in contested case, §

50-13-19

.